Hawaii statutes.
[§200-20] Hawaiian outrigger canoes on
state shoreline areas. Hawaiian outrigger canoe clubs registered with the
Hawaiian Canoe Racing Association, Hui Wa‘a Association, its affiliates, or its
successor organization may keep their Hawaiian outrigger canoes at no charge on
state shoreline areas; provided that:

(1) The club shall indemnify, hold harmless, and
defend the State, its officers, agents, and employees from and against any and
all claims arising out of or resulting from activities carried out or
undertaken under this section, and shall procure sufficient insurance to
provide this indemnification if requested by the department;

(2) The club shall coordinate the placement of canoes
with the applicable state or county authority to appropriately accommodate all
beach users; and

(3) Where required, the club shall secure an annual
revocable permit from the applicable state or county agency. [L 2005, c 220,
§2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next